Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF495.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0132, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 40. new text end new text begin Day care costs. new text end new text begin (a) The amount of day care costs is a subtraction. new text end new text begin (b) For the purposes of this subdivision: new text end new text begin (1) "day care costs" means the amount a taxpayer paid to a licensed child care program for child care in the taxable year; and new text end new text begin (2) "licensed child care program" means a child care center or family or group family child care licensed under chapter 142B. new text end new text begin (c) The subtraction under this subdivision is limited to the amount paid in excess of the amount of dependent care assistance the taxpayer excluded from gross income under section 129 of the Internal Revenue Code. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end